Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-14,110
Landlord; assessment contract authorized.

Nothing in the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act shall prohibit a landlord from contracting with tenants in order to provide services or facilities on an assessment basis.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 61.